Nevada, session 83, SB81-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Section 1 of chapter 144, Statutes of Nevada 2019,
at page 798, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Section 1. 1. The Legislature hereby finds and
declares that:
(a) The region of Carson City, Douglas County, Lyon
County, Storey County and Washoe County is a unique,
contiguous geographical area that comprises the northwestern
border of Nevada.
(b) As part of one of the fastest-growing [state] states in
the nation, the population of this region has increased rapidly
in recent years, especially as a result of the location of
substantial economic development projects in the region.
(c) This increased population and economic development
activity has had a significant impact on resources beyond the
boundaries of individual political subdivisions, affecting the
region in such areas as transportation, land use development
and public services and facilities.
(d) The increased demand from development has placed
a significant amount of stress on the I-80 commercial
corridor within Lyon, Storey and Washoe Counties,
necessitating a strong focus to protect residents and visitors
as well as the economic vitality of the region.
(e) Because of the unique conditions in the region, a
general law cannot be made applicable and necessitates this
special act to require discussion and planning for the orderly
management of growth in the region in a collaborative and
structured manner by the counties and cities in the region for
the well-being of the residents as well as the long-term
economic development of the region.
2. On or before December [31] 1 of each calendar year
during the period between July 1, [2019,] 2023, and
December [31, 2022,] 1, 2026, each county in the region, in
consultation with any cities within each such county, shall
meet to discuss and identify the positive and negative issues
-
*SB81_R2*

– 3 –
relating to growth in the region that are impacting any
county in the region and prepare and submit to each
Legislator who represents any portion of the [county] region
a [separate] joint report that:
(a) Identifies [issues] each positive or negative issue
relating to the orderly management of growth in the region
that is impacting any county, including cities within [the]
any county [, and] in the region, including, without
limitation, issues in the following areas:
(1) Conservation, including, without limitation, the use
and protection of natural resources [;] , architectural
conservation and preservation planning;
(2) Population, including, without limitation, projected
population growth in the region and the projected resources
of the county or city that are necessary to support that
regional population [;] growth;
(3) Land use and development;
(4) Transportation [;] , including, without limitation,
the I-80 corridor and surrounding arterials; and
(5) Public facilities and services, including, without
limitation, roads, water and sewer service, flood control,
police and fire protection, mass transit, libraries and parks.
(b) [Makes] Set forth recommendations [regarding] that
are intended to resolve any negative impact on those issues
[.] that are identified in the joint report.
3. In preparing the joint report required by subsection 2,
each county in the region and any city within such a county
may consult with and solicit input concerning issues relating
to the orderly management of growth in the county, city or
region from any state agency, including, without limitation,
the Department of Transportation and the Office of
Economic Development, and from other entities in the
county, including, without limitation, [the] school [district]
districts and any town, airport authority, regional
transportation commission, water authority, military base,
flood control agency, public safety agency or Indian colony
or tribe in the county. Such input may include, without
limitation, any I-80 corridor planning reports prepared by
the Department of Transportation.
4. During the period between January 1, [2020,] 2024,
and [December 1, 2023,] January 1, 2027, two members, one
from the majority political party and one from the minority
political party, of the Senate whose legislative districts
include any area within the region and designated by the
Majority Leader of the Senate, two members, one from the
-
*SB81_R2*

– 4 –
majority political party and one from the minority political
party, of the Assembly whose legislative districts include any
area within the region and designated by the Speaker of the
Assembly, the county manager of each county in the region or
his or her designee, or if a county manager is not appointed
pursuant to NRS 244.125, a person designated by the board of
county commissioners of the county, and the city manager of
each city in the region or his or her designee or, if the city
does not have a city manager, a person designated by the
governing body of the city, shall meet jointly at least twice
during each calendar year in that period to identify and
discuss the positive and negative issues relating to the orderly
management of growth in the region, including, without
limitation, the issues identified and any recommendations
made in the joint reports prepared pursuant to subsection 2.
Each Legislator and city manager serve in an ex officio
capacity and are not voting members.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, on or
before December [1] 31 of each calendar year during the
period between January 1, [2020,] 2024, and [December 1,
2023, the counties in the region, in consultation with the cities
in the region,] January 1, 2027, the county managers or
their designees described in subsection 4 shall prepare a joint
regional report of the issues identified during the meetings
held pursuant to subsection 4 during that calendar year and
any recommendations made relating to those issues . [and
submit the report] The contents of each joint regional report
must be approved by a simple majority of the county
managers or their designees described in subsection 4. Each
joint regional report must be submitted to each Legislator
who represents any portion of a county in the region and to
the Legislative Commission. [The] Each joint report that
must be submitted [on or before December 1, 2023,]
pursuant to this subsection must address comprehensively all
the issues identified and recommendations made by the
counties and cities in the [region during the period between
January 1, 2020, and December 1, 2023, relating to the
orderly management of growth in the region.] joint report
prepared by the counties and cities pursuant to subsection 2.
6. A Legislator is not entitled to compensation or to any
per diem or travel expenses to attend a meeting described in
subsection 4.
7. As used in this section, “region” means the combined
geographical area consisting of Carson City, Douglas County,
Lyon County, Storey County and Washoe County.
-
*SB81_R2*

– 5 –
Sec. 2. Section 2 of chapter 144, Statutes of Nevada 2019, at
page 800, is hereby amended to read as follows:
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2019 . [,
and expires by limitation on December 31, 2023.]
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*SB81_R2*